New Jersey, session 221, A1377.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7.1 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-12) is amended to read as follows: 7.1. Notice pursuant to subsections a., b., d., e., f., g. [and], h. , and k. of this section shall be given by the applicant unless a particular municipal officer is so designated by ordinance; provided that nothing contained herein shall prevent the applicant from giving such notice if he so desires.  Notice pursuant to subsections a., b., d., e., f., g. [and], h, and k. of this section shall be given at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing. a.     Public notice of a hearing shall be given for an extension of approvals for five or more years under subsection d. of section 37 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-49) and subsection b. of section 40 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-52); for modification or elimination of a significant condition or conditions in a memorializing resolution in any situation wherein the application for development for which the memorializing resolution is proposed for adoption required public notice, and for any other applications for development, with the following exceptions: (1) conventional site plan review pursuant to section 34 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-46), (2) minor subdivisions pursuant to section 35 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-47) or (3) final approval pursuant to section 38 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-50); notwithstanding the foregoing, the governing body may by ordinance require public notice for such categories of site plan review as may be specified by ordinance, for appeals of determinations of administrative officers pursuant to subsection a. of section 57 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-70), and for requests for interpretation pursuant to subsection b. of section 57 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-70).  Public notice shall also be given in the event that relief is requested pursuant to section 47 or 63 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-60 or C.40:55D-76) as part of an application for development otherwise excepted herein from public notice. In addition, public notice shall be given by a public entity seeking to erect an outdoor advertising sign on land owned or controlled by a public entity as required pursuant to section 22 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-31) or, if so provided by ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection g. of section 29.1 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-39), by a private entity seeking to erect an outdoor advertising sign on public land or on land owned by a private entity. Public notice shall be given by publication in the official newspaper of the municipality, if there be one, or in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality. b.    Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection h. of this section, notice of a hearing requiring public notice pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be given to the owners of all real property as shown on the current tax duplicates, located in the State and within 200 feet in all directions of the property which is the subject of such hearing; provided that this requirement shall be deemed satisfied by notice to the (1) condominium association, in the case of any unit owner whose unit has a unit above or below it, or (2) horizontal property regime, in the case of any co-owner whose apartment has an apartment above or below it.  Notice shall be given by: (1) serving a copy thereof on the property owner as shown on the said current tax duplicate, or his agent in charge of the property, or (2) mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the property owner at his address as shown on the said current tax duplicate. Notice to a partnership owner may be made by service upon any partner.  Notice to a corporate owner may be made by service upon its president, a vice president, secretary or other person authorized by appointment or by law to accept service on behalf of the corporation.  Notice to a condominium association, horizontal property regime, community trust or homeowners' association, because of its ownership of common elements or areas located within 200 feet of the property which is the subject of the hearing, may be made in the same manner as to a corporation without further notice to unit owners, co-owners, or homeowners on account of such common elements or areas. c.     Upon the written request of an applicant, the administrative officer of a municipality shall, within seven days, make and certify a list from said current tax duplicates of names and addresses of owners to whom the applicant is required to give notice pursuant to subsection b. of this section.  In addition, the administrative officer shall include on the list the names, addresses and positions of those persons who, not less than seven days prior to the date on which the applicant requested the list, have registered to receive notice pursuant to subsection h. of this section.  The applicant shall be entitled to rely upon the information contained in such list, and failure to give notice to any owner, to any public utility, cable television company, or local utility or to any military facility commander not on the list shall not invalidate any hearing or proceeding.  A sum not to exceed $0.25 per name, or $10.00, whichever is greater, may be charged for such list. d.    Notice of hearings on applications for development involving property located within 200 feet of an adjoining municipality shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the clerk of such municipality. e.     Notice shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the county planning board of a hearing on an application for development of property adjacent to an existing county road or proposed road shown on the official county map or on the county master plan, adjoining other county land or situated within 200 feet of a municipal boundary. f.     Notice shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the Commissioner of Transportation of a hearing on an application for development of property adjacent to a State highway. g.    Notice shall be given by personal service or certified mail to the State Planning Commission of a hearing on an application for development of property which exceeds 150 acres or 500 dwelling units.  The notice shall include a copy of any maps or documents required to be on file with the municipal clerk pursuant to subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-10). h.    Notice of hearings on applications for approval of a major subdivision or a site plan not defined as a minor site plan under this act requiring public notice pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be given: (1) in the case of a public utility, cable television company or local utility which possesses a right-of-way or easement within the municipality and which has registered with the municipality in accordance with section 5 of P.L.1991, c.412 (C.40:55D-12.1), by (i) serving a copy of the notice on the person whose name appears on the registration form on behalf of the public utility, cable television company or local utility or (ii) mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the person whose name appears on the registration form at the address shown on that form; (2) in the case of a military facility which has registered with the municipality and which is situated within 3,000 feet in all directions of the property which is the subject of the hearing, by (i) serving a copy of the notice on the military facility commander whose name appears on the registration form or (ii) mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the military facility commander at the address shown on that form. i.     The applicant shall file an affidavit of proof of service with the municipal agency holding the hearing on the application for development in the event that the applicant is required to give notice pursuant to this section. j.     Notice pursuant to subsections d., e., f., g. [and], h, and k. of this section shall not be deemed to be required, unless public notice pursuant to subsection a. and notice pursuant to subsection b. of this section are required. k.    Notice of a hearing on an application for development for a property with a residential tenant shall be given to each residential tenant either (1) by personal service, or (2) by mailing a copy by certified mail to the tenant's mailing address, as known to the property owner or landlord, or (3) by requiring that the property owner or landlord shall post the hearing notice in a conspicuous place in at least one interior common area accessible to residential tenants, at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing and, to the extent practicable, maintain the posting until the day following the date of the hearing; provided, however, that this posting requirement shall not be an option if there is no interior common area.  An application for development for a property with a residential tenant shall not be approved until the owner or landlord files a certification with the municipal agency that notices have been provided to every tenant as required pursuant to this subsection. (cf: P.L.2005, c.41, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.